Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1251YH (3) 91 je/js H.F. 282 Section 1. Section 96.4, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. The individual is able to work, is available for work, 3 and is earnestly and actively seeking work. This subsection 4 is waived if the individual is deemed partially unemployed, 5 while employed at the individualâs regular job, as defined 6 in section 96.1A, subsection 37 , paragraph âbâ , subparagraph 7 (1), or temporarily unemployed as defined in section 96.1A, 8 subsection 37 , paragraph âcâ . This subsection is waived if 9 the individual is not disqualified for benefits under section 10 96.5, subsection 3, paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (4). The work 11 search requirements of this subsection and the disqualification 12 requirement for failure to apply for, or to accept suitable 13 work of section 96.5, subsection 3 , are waived if the 14 individual is not disqualified for benefits under section 96.5, 15 subsection 1 , paragraph âhâ . 16 Sec. 2. Section 96.5, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2025, 17 is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 18 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) The individual is participating in a 19 strike or other labor dispute resulting in a stoppage of work 20 at the factory, establishment, or other premises at which the 21 individual is or was last employed. 22 Sec. 3. Section 96.5, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended by 23 striking the subsection. 24